Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1222
Private writing; when admissible without proof.

Every private writing, except a last will and testament, after being acknowledged or proved and certified in the manner prescribed for the proof or acknowledgment of conveyances of real property, may be read in evidence without further proof.

R.S.1867, Code § 347, p. 452;

R.S.1913, § 7914;

C.S.1922, § 8856;

C.S.1929, § 20-1222;

R.S.1943, § 25-1222.

Letter in answer, if self explanatory, is admissible by itself. New Hampshire Trust Co. v. Korsmeyer Plumbing & Heating Co., 57 Neb. 784, 78 N.W. 303 (1899).

Memorandum made contemporaneously with the facts therein noted, when supplemented by oath of party who made it, is admissible as independent evidence. Imhoff v. Richards, 48 Neb. 590, 67 N.W. 483 (1896).

Proof of preexistence and search for written evidence is essential to admission of secondary evidence. Samuelson v. Gale Mfg. Co., 1 Neb. Unof. 815, 95 N.W. 809 (1901).